Utah statutes.
17-16a-11.   County ethics commission -- Complaints charging violations -- Procedure.

(1)  A county may establish by ordinance an ethics commission to review a complaint, except as provided in Subsection (3), against an officer or employee subject to this part for a violation of a provision of this part.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), a person filing a complaint for a violation of this part shall file the complaint:

(i)  with the county ethics commission, if the county has established a county ethics commission in accordance with Subsection (1); or

(ii)  with the Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission established in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 49, Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission if the county has not established a county ethics commission.

(b)  A county that receives a complaint described in Subsection (2)(a) may:

(i)  accept the complaint if the county has established a county ethics commission in accordance with Subsection (1); or

(ii)  forward the complaint to the Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission established in Section 11-49-201:

(A)  regardless of whether the county has established a county ethics commission; or

(B)  if the county has not established a county ethics commission.

(3)  Any complaint against a person who is under the merit system, charging that person with a violation of this part, shall be filed and processed in accordance with the provisions of the merit system.



Amended by Chapter 202, 2012 General Session

